Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.110

Attorneys' fees.

No attorney's fee shall be charged to or received from any legal aid client as to any legal aid matter handled by or through the bureau. All attorneys' fees and court costs collected from any third party by the bureau in the name of any legal aid client shall become a part of the bureau's operation funds.

[ 1939 c 93 s 11; RRS s 10007-211. Formerly RCW 74.36.110.]